North Carolina, session 2025, HB801.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Legislative Research Commission (LRC) shall study the
current status of "paper towns" in North Carolina. For purposes of this act, the term "paper town"
means a town that exists in fact but does not provide adequate services, as required by law, to its
residents. As part of the study, the LRC shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether towns incorporated by the General Assembly since 1995
are currently providing the services proposed by the petitioners in the petition
to incorporate submitted to the then existing Joint Legislative Commission on
Municipal Incorporation.
(2) Determine whether the services currently being provided by each town are
sufficient to sustain the incorporation for purposes of continued taxation,
zoning, and regulation of the right to control private property.
(3) Determine whether the General Assembly should take action regarding any of
the towns studied, including suspension or revocation of the charter, due to
the failure of the town to provide critical services sufficient to sustain the
incorporation.
(4) Review the statutory criteria for incorporation as provided in Part 2 of Article
20 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes to determine what, if any, changes
should be made to ensure that towns continue to provide a sufficient level of
services after being incorporated, including those proposed in the petition to
incorporate, to justify continued incorporation of the town.
SECTION 1.(b) The LRC shall make a final report on its study, including any
proposed legislation, to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly upon its
convening.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H801-v-1*